Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 18, as last


amended by Section 12, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 18), is amended to read as follows:


Section 18. A. Persons authorized to file a motion for


expungement, as provided herein, must be within one of the following


categories:


1. The person has been acquitted;


2. The conviction was reversed with instructions to dismiss by


an appellate court of competent jurisdiction, or an appellate court

Req. No. 794 Page 1


of competent jurisdiction reversed the conviction and the


prosecuting agency subsequently dismissed the charge;


3. The factual innocence of the person was established by the


use of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) evidence subsequent to


conviction, including a person who has been released from prison at


the time innocence was established;


4. The person has received a full pardon by the Governor for


the crime for which the person was sentenced;


5. The person was arrested and no charges of any type,


including charges for an offense different than that for which the


person was originally arrested, are filed and the statute of


limitations has expired or the prosecuting agency has declined to


file charges;


6. The person was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time


the offense was committed and the person has received a full pardon


for the offense;


7. The person was charged with one or more misdemeanor or


felony crimes, all charges have been dismissed, the person has never


been convicted of a felony, no misdemeanor or felony charges are


pending against the person and the statute of limitations for


refiling the charge or charges has expired or the prosecuting agency


confirms that the charge or charges will not be refiled; provided,


however, this category shall not apply to charges that have been



Req. No. 794 Page 2


dismissed following the completion of a deferred judgment or delayed


sentence;


8. The person was charged with a misdemeanor, the charge was


dismissed following the successful completion of a deferred judgment


or delayed sentence, the person has never been convicted of a


felony, no misdemeanor or felony charges are pending against the


person and at least one (1) year has passed since the charge was


dismissed;


9. The person was charged with a nonviolent felony offense not


listed in Section 571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the


charge was dismissed following the successful completion of a


deferred judgment or delayed sentence, the person has never been


convicted of a felony, no misdemeanor or felony charges are pending


against the person and at least five (5) years have passed since the


charge was dismissed;


10. The person was convicted of a misdemeanor offense, the


person was sentenced to a fine of less than Five Hundred One Dollars


($501.00) without a term of imprisonment or a suspended sentence,


the fine has been paid or satisfied by time served in lieu of the


fine, the person has not been convicted of a felony and no felony or


misdemeanor charges are pending against the person;


11. The person was convicted of a misdemeanor offense, the


person was sentenced to a term of imprisonment, a suspended sentence


or a fine in an amount greater than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),

Req. No. 794 Page 3


the person has not been convicted of a felony, no felony or


misdemeanor charges are pending against the person and at least five


(5) years have passed since the end of the last misdemeanor


sentence;


12. The person was convicted of a nonviolent felony offense not


listed in Section 571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the


person has not been convicted of any other felony, the person has


not been convicted of a separate misdemeanor in the last seven (7)


years, no felony or misdemeanor charges are pending against the


person and at least five (5) years have passed since the completion


of the sentence for the felony conviction;


13. The person was convicted of not more than two felony


offenses, none of which is a felony offense listed in Section 13.1


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes or any offense that would


require the person to register pursuant to the provisions of the Sex


Offenders Registration Act, no felony or misdemeanor charges are


pending against the person, and at least ten (10) years have passed


since the completion of the sentence for the felony conviction;


14. The person was charged with not more than two felony


offenses and the charges were dismissed following the successful


completion of a deferred judgment or delayed sentence, none of which


were felony offenses listed in Section 13.1 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes or would require the person to register pursuant


to the provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act, no felony

Req. No. 794 Page 4


or misdemeanor charges are pending against the person, and at least


ten (10) years have passed since the charges were dismissed;


15. The person has been charged or arrested or is the subject


of an arrest warrant for a crime that was committed by another


person who has appropriated or used the person’s name or other


identification without the person’s consent or authorization; or


16. The person was convicted of a nonviolent felony offense not


listed in Section 571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes which was


subsequently reclassified as a misdemeanor under Oklahoma law, the


person is not currently serving a sentence for a crime in this state


or another state, at least thirty (30) days have passed since the


completion or commutation of the sentence for the crime that was


reclassified as a misdemeanor, any restitution ordered by the court


to be paid by the person has been satisfied in full, and any


treatment program ordered by the court has been successfully


completed by the person, including any person who failed a treatment


program which resulted in an accelerated or revoked sentence that


has since been successfully completed by the person or the person


can show successful completion of a treatment program at a later


date. Persons seeking an expungement of records under the


provisions of this paragraph may utilize the expungement forms


provided in Section 18a of this title.


B. For purposes of Section 18 et seq. of this title,


“expungement” shall mean the sealing of criminal records, as well as

Req. No. 794 Page 5


any public civil record, involving actions brought by and against


the State of Oklahoma arising from the same arrest, transaction or


occurrence.


C. Beginning three (3) years after the effective date of this


act and subject to the availability of funds, individuals with clean


slate eligible cases shall be eligible to have their criminal


records sealed automatically. For purposes of Section 18 et seq. of


this title, “clean slate eligible case” shall mean a case where each


charge within the case is pursuant to paragraph 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7, 8,


10, 11, 15, or 16 of subsection A of this section.


D. 1. On or after the effective date of this act, any person


who was convicted of a nonviolent misdemeanor offense shall have his


or her nonviolent misdemeanor criminal arrest records automatically


expunged if:


a. at least ten (10) years have passed since the date of


conviction,


b. the person has not been convicted of a felony,


c. all fines, fees, and restitution ordered by the court


have been paid, and


d. no felony or misdemeanor charges are pending against


the person.


2. Nothing in this section precludes a person from filing a


petition for expungement of records that are eligible for automatic



Req. No. 794 Page 6


expungement if an automatic expungement has not occurred pursuant to


this subsection.


3. An automatic expungement performed under the provisions of


this subsection shall not preclude the prosecuting agency, the


arresting agency, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, or


other interested person or agency from petitioning the court for an


order unsealing the records in accordance with subsection P of


Section 19 of this title.


4. If deemed necessary, the Supreme Court shall promulgate


rules for the district courts to implement the provisions of this


subsection.


E. For purposes of seeking an expungement under the provisions


of paragraph 10, 11, 12 or 13 of subsection A of this section,


offenses arising out of the same transaction or occurrence shall be


treated as one conviction and offense.


E. F. Records expunged pursuant to paragraphs 4, 8, 9, 10, 11,


12, 13, 14, 15 and 16 of subsection A of this section shall be


sealed to the public but not to law enforcement agencies for law


enforcement purposes. Records expunged pursuant to paragraphs 8, 9,


10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 of subsection A of this section shall be


admissible in any subsequent criminal prosecution to prove the


existence of a prior conviction or prior deferred judgment without


the necessity of a court order requesting the unsealing of the


records. Records expunged pursuant to paragraph 4 or 6 of

Req. No. 794 Page 7


subsection A of this section may also include the sealing of Pardon


and Parole Board records related to an application for a pardon.


Such records shall be sealed to the public but not to the Pardon and


Parole Board.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-794 TEK 1/16/2025 2:53:07 PM



































Req. No. 794 Page 8